Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5620XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2034 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321P.4A Automated vehicle noise 1 enforcement systems. 2 1. A local authority shall not issue a citation for a 3 violation detected by an automated vehicle noise enforcement 4 system based on noise emitted from the use of a vehicleâs brake 5 or exhaust system while the vehicle is reducing speed. 6 2. A citation issued in violation of subsection 1 is void 7 and unenforceable. 8 3. For purposes of this section, âautomated vehicle noise 9 enforcement systemâ means a camera or other optical device 10 designed to work in conjunction with a noise measuring device 11 to detect and automatically capture or store an image or any 12 accompanying data of a vehicle emitting noise that exceeds a 13 specified noise level restriction. 14